Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RECONSTRUCTION OF THE INTERCHANGE AT TRUNK HIGHWAY 13 AND NICOLLET AVENUE; BURNSVILLE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation; general obligation bonds. new text end new text begin $22,250,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign, right-of-way acquisition, design, engineering, and construction of grade separation and other capacity and safety improvements to the interchange at marked Trunk Highway 13 and Nicollet Avenue in Burnsville. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of general obligation bonds. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation; trunk highway bonds. new text end new text begin $22,250,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for predesign, right-of-way acquisition, design, engineering, and construction of grade separation and other capacity and safety improvements to the interchange at marked Trunk Highway 13 and Nicollet Avenue in Burnsville. This appropriation is for the portion of the project that is eligible for use of trunk highway funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Bond sale; general obligation bonds. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 1 from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $22,250,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Bond sale; trunk highway bonds. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in subdivision 2 from the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $22,250,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 167.50 to 167.52, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XIV, section 11, at the times and in the amounts requested by the commissioner of transportation. The proceeds of the bonds, except accrued interest and any premium received from the sale of the bonds, must be deposited in the bond proceeds account in the trunk highway fund. new text end